translit/cyr2lat.lexd
PATTERNS
(Letters|Stress|SpecialCharacters)*

LEXICON Letters
а:a     # a
ā:ā     # aː
б:b     # b
в:v     # v
w:w     # w
г:g     # g
ғ:ɣ     # ʁ
ɣ̌:ɣ̌     # ɣ
д:d     # d
ð:δ     # ð
δ:δ     # ð
е:e     # eː
ê:ê     # ɛː
ж:ž     # ʒ
з:z     # z
ȥ:dz    # d͜z
ӡ:dz    # d͜z
Ӡ:dz    # d͜z
Ʒ:dz    # d͜z
ȥ:ʒ     # d͜z
ӡ:ʒ     # d͜z
Ӡ:ʒ     # d͜z
Ʒ:ʒ     # d͜z
и:i     # ɪ
й:y     # j
ӣ:ī     # iː
ӣ:ī     # iː
к:k     # k
қ:q     # q
л:l     # l
м:m     # m
н:n     # n
о:o     # ɔː
ō:o     # ɔː
п:p     # p
р:r     # ɾ
с:s     # s
т:t     # t
θ:θ     # θ
ϑ:θ     # θ
у:u     # ʊ
ӯ:ū     # uː
у̊:ů     # øː
ф:f     # f
х:x     # χ
х̌:x̌     # x
ҳ:h     # h
ц:c     # t͜s
ч:č     # t͜ʃ
ш:š     # ʃ
ҷ:ǰ     # d͜ʒ

LEXICON SpecialCharacters
-:-
\>:\>

LEXICON Stress
́
